Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1715
Airport; park; waterworks system; sewerage system; outside corporate limits; police jurisdiction.

Any municipality in Nebraska owning, controlling, or operating an airport, park, waterworks system, sewerage system, or any portion of the same, or any other municipal facility, outside the corporate limits of such municipality, may exercise police jurisdiction over the same, and with the same force and effect as though such properties were located within the corporate limits of such municipality.

Laws 1961, c. 55, § 1, p. 208.